Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2603
Location.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person shall locate or maintain a junkyard, any portion of which is within one thousand feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any roadway of the Highway Beautification Control System, without obtaining a permit from the department.

(2) Junkyards located in counties which have formally adopted a comprehensive development plan and a zoning resolution regulating the location of junkyards within one thousand feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any roadway of the Highway Beautification Control System, except those routes which consist of the federally designated National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, shall be exempt from the permit requirements of sections 39-2601 to 39-2612.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 186, § 1.